Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
26-1-114.5. Records - access by county auditor.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), a county department of human or social services shall provide to an auditor conducting a financial or performance audit of the county department access to all of the records, reports, papers, files, and communications of the county department, including any personal identifying information of individuals contained in the records, reports, papers, files, and communications necessary to achieve the stated audit objectives.

A county department of human or social services shall not make information available if the release would violate a federal confidentiality or privacy law.

This section applies to an auditor retained by a county or authorized pursuant to a county charter or ordinance.

Information required to be kept confidential or exempt from public disclosure pursuant to any other law or rule of the state department of human services or the department of early childhood or upon subpoena, search warrant, discovery proceedings, or otherwise, including personal identifying information, that is obtained by an auditor pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must not be:

Released, disclosed, or made available for inspection to any person by the auditor, the auditor's staff, or an audit oversight committee; or

Disclosed or contained in an audit report that is released for public inspection.

A person who releases information required to be kept confidential or exempt from public disclosure in violation of subsection (3) of this section is subject to the applicable criminal or civil penalty for the unlawful release of the information.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the authority of the state auditor pursuant to section 2-3-107 (2)(a), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1370), ch. 324, p. 1325, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2022:

IP(3) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 852, § 83, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1370, see section 1 of chapter 324, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

26-1-115. County departments - district departments.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, there is established in each county of the state a county department of human or social services that consists of a county board of human or social services, a county director of human or social services, and such additional employees as may be necessary for the efficient performance of public assistance and welfare activities, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, and social services.

With the approval of the state department of human services, two or more counties may jointly establish a district department of human or social services. All duties and responsibilities set forth in this title 26 for county departments of human or social services also apply to district departments of human or social services.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1990, § 15, effective July 1, 2006.)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1170, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-14.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1082, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1895, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1990, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 446, § 115, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-1-116. County boards - district boards.

The county board shall consist of the board of county commissioners in each county; except that "board of county commissioners" as used in this title, in the city and county of Denver, means the department or agency with the responsibility for public assistance and welfare activities and, in the city and county of Broomfield, means the city council or a board or commission appointed by the city and county of Broomfield.

In the case of a district department established pursuant to section 26-1-115 (2), the district board shall consist of not less than three members, and each county in the district shall select one or more of its county commissioners to serve as a member of the district board. The district board shall, in relation to the district department, have all the powers, duties, and responsibilities which the county board has in relation to the county department.

The county board shall elect a chairman who shall preside at meetings and, when authorized by the board, shall sign all necessary documents for the board.

The county board may hold a meeting to address the public assistance and welfare duties, responsibilities, and activities of the county department in conjunction with a meeting of the board of county commissioners, upon full and timely notice given pursuant to the provisions of section 24-6-402. The county board shall act in accordance with rules adopted by the state board when addressing public assistance, and welfare duties, responsibilities, and activities of the county department. The county board shall act in accordance with rules adopted by the executive director of the department of early childhood when addressing child care assistance duties, responsibilities, and activities of the county department.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1170, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-15.

L. 79:

(1)(a) and (3) amended, p. 1083, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 256, § 1, effective November 15.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 371, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 852, § 84, effective July 1.

26-1-117. County director - district director.

It is the duty of the county board to appoint a county director, who is charged with the executive and administrative duties and responsibilities of the county department, subject to the policies and rules of the state department and the department of early childhood, and who serves as secretary to the county board, unless a secretary is otherwise appointed by the board. The board of county commissioners of the county shall establish the salary of the county director. The state department shall reimburse the salary of the county director as provided in section 26-1-120.

In the case of a district department established pursuant to section 26-1-115 (2), the district board shall appoint one district director to serve the entire district. Such district director shall be appointed in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as the county director provided for in subsection (1) of this section. The district director shall, in relation to the district department, have all the powers, duties, and responsibilities which the county director has in relation to the county department.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1170, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-16.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1369, § 1, effective June 9.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1189, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 852, § 85, effective July 1.

26-1-118. Duties of county departments, county directors, and district attorneys.

The county departments or other state designated agencies, where applicable, shall serve as agents of the state department and are charged with the administration of public assistance, and welfare and related activities in the respective counties in accordance with the rules of the state department.

The county departments or other state designated agencies, where applicable, shall serve as agents of the department of early childhood and are charged with the administration of child care assistance and related activities in the respective counties in accordance with the rules of the department of early childhood.

The county departments or other state designated agencies, where applicable, shall report to the state department and the department of early childhood at such times and in such manner and form as the state department and the department of early childhood may from time to time direct. The state department and the department of early childhood may require a county department to report information concerning county employees, including but not limited to qualifications, work schedules, pay, duties, evaluations, training, and corrective and disciplinary actions. A county department may provide the information by use of a unique identifier for each employee that provides the information without identifying the name of the employee. However, nothing in this section prevents access by the state department or the department of early childhood to individual employee files, to the extent permitted by state and federal law, for purposes of carrying out the responsibility of the state department for the supervision and administration of programs funded in whole or in part by the state department or for purposes of carrying out the responsibility of the department of early childhood for the supervision and administration of child care assistance. The state department and the department of early childhood shall maintain the confidentiality of such records in a manner consistent with state and federal law.

(2.5) Repealed.

The county department or other state designated agencies, where applicable, in each county shall submit quarterly and annually to the board of county commissioners a budget containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out the provisions of this title.

When appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction and consistent with state department rules and regulations, the county director shall perform under the supervision of such court the function of officer or agent of the court in any social services matters which may be before it.

The county department may receive for placement in foster care any child upon agreement of his parent, his guardian, or any other person having legal custody of such child. Such agreements, provided for in this subsection (5), shall be in writing and on forms prescribed by the state department and may contain any proper and legal provisions for proper care of the child and such other provisions as may be considered necessary by the state department.

The county department shall report, to the district attorney monthly, data relating to fraudulent activities covering, as a minimum, the activities specified in paragraphs (a), (b), and (d) of this subsection (6), and the district attorney shall likewise report, monthly to the county department, the data specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (6), as follows when applicable:

Investigations (including welfare and district attorney cases accepted for fraud investigation during the month);

Welfare action - assistance denials and assistance reductions;

District attorney action:

Criminal complaints requested during the month;

Criminal complaints declined during the month;

Cases dismissed during the month;

Cases acquitted during the month;

Convictions during the month;

Confessions of judgments (notes);

Recoveries:

Fines and penalties ______ (in dollars);

Restitutions ordered ______ (in dollars);

Restitutions collected ______ (in dollars).

The counties may prepare and issue to all payees, excluding heads of households in nonpublic assistance food stamp cases, at the time of delivery of any public assistance, a hermetically sealed photo identification card which is manufactured in such a secure manner as to resist duplication or intrusion and containing the full name, a card identification number, and any other data which would insure proper identification. A county department shall refer to the appropriate law enforcement agency for investigation, within ten working days after discovery, any information it may have concerning the improper use of a photo identification card by a person not eligible to possess such card.

Starting in the calendar year 1979, no less than eight hours of fraud prevention training shall be given to all eligibility technicians, caseworkers, resource investigators, homemakers, supervisors, and such other persons within the county department as the county director deems necessary, who have not previously received such training. Such training shall be conducted by a law enforcement agency or its appropriate professional association.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1171, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-17.

L. 75:

(5) added, p. 894, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(6) to (9) added, p. 1332, § 2, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(8) R&RE, p. 1092, § 1, effective May 22; (9) repealed, p. 1093, § 2, effective June 21.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(2.5) added, p. 38, § 3, effective July 25.

L. 91:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1896, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2.5) repealed, p. 1221, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1527, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(7) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2115, § 153, effective August 11.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 852, § 86, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 327, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

26-1-119. County staff.

The county director, with the approval of the county board, shall appoint such staff as may be necessary as determined by the state department rules to administer public assistance and welfare and child welfare activities within his or her county. Such staff shall be appointed and shall serve in accordance with a merit system for the selection, retention, and promotion of county department employees as described in section 26-1-120. The salaries of the members of such staff shall be fixed in accordance with the rules and salary schedules prescribed by the state department; except that, once a county transfers its county employees to a successor merit system as provided in section 26-1-120, the salaries shall be fixed by the county commissioners.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1171, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-18.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1145, § 83, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1184, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1991, § 16, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

26-1-120. Merit system.

On January 1, 2001, the merit system for the selection, retention, and promotion of employees of the county departments that has been operated by the state department pursuant to this section is abolished. Beginning on or after July 1, 1997, but no later than January 1, 2001, each county shall provide for a merit system for the selection, retention, and promotion of employees of the county departments that complies with the criteria specified in subsection (8) of this section and with any other federal standards for a merit system of personnel administration for employees, specified as a condition of receipt of federal funds as set forth in subpart F of 5 CFR 900.601, et seq. A county can combine with another county or form a district to provide such a merit system for its employees. The county department shall certify to the state department that the successor merit system of personnel administration used by the county is in conformance with the federal standards. Prior to transferring county employees to a successor merit system, each county shall submit a transition plan to the state department outlining its plan for transferring such employees and for addressing issues that may arise during the transfer, such as salary issues, retention, seniority rights, and appeal processes. The state department shall examine and approve the transition plan if the state department determines that the transition plan is reasonable and that the merit system meets the federal standards. The county may not implement the transition plan or transfer employees to the successor merit system until the state department has approved the transition plan. The state shall not unreasonably withhold approval. Any transition plan for transferring county employees from the state merit system to a successor merit system shall include protections for employees that allow them to retain any accrued annual or sick leave benefits and that compensate such employees at the same or higher rate of salary. The state department shall provide assistance to counties regarding the transition of county employees from the state merit system to a successor merit system. Nothing in this section shall preclude a county from reorganizing employee staff functions or abolishing positions to achieve greater efficiencies in operations.

(1.5) Any moneys saved as a result of eliminating the state merit system shall be available to counties to implement the transition from the state merit system to a successor merit system.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

The merit system provided by the counties shall meet the following federal criteria:

The recruitment, selection, and advancement of employees shall be on the basis of relative abilities, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment.

The system shall provide equitable and adequate compensation.

The employees shall be trained as needed to assure high quality of performance.

The system shall provide for retaining employees on the basis of the adequacy of their performance, correcting inadequate performance, and separating employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected.

The system shall assure fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personnel administration without regard to political affiliation, race, color, national origin, sex, religious creed, age, or disability and with proper regard for the privacy and constitutional rights of such persons as citizens. This fair treatment principle shall include compliance with all federal equal opportunity and nondiscrimination laws.

The system shall assure that employees are protected against coercion for partisan political purposes and are prohibited from using their official authority for the purpose of interfering with or affecting the results of an election or a nomination for office.

(8.5) The merit system provided by the counties must assure fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personnel administration without regard to race, creed, color, religion, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, national origin, or ancestry.

With respect to the merit system provided by the counties, the state board of human services shall promulgate rules on the following:

Minimum standards for qualifications of certain positions that are determined by the state board to necessitate uniform standards;

Establishment of maximum state reimbursement levels for the salaries of county department employees and county directors.

Repealed.

The county director of a county department shall be exempt from the merit system established and maintained by the state department pursuant to this section as it existed prior to July 1, 1997. Each county shall determine whether to exempt its county director from the successor merit system designed pursuant to this section. Until the county provides for a successor merit system as provided in this section, the state department shall reimburse only eighty percent of the salary established in the compensation plan pursuant to rules of the state department or eighty percent of the actual salary, whichever is less. After the county provides for a successor merit system as provided in this section, the state department shall reimburse only eighty percent of the actual salary; except that such reimbursement shall not exceed the maximum state reimbursement level established by the state board pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1171, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-19.

L. 75:

(5)(d) amended, p. 895, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 76:

(6) added, p. 587, § 26, effective May 24.

L. 79:

(7) added, p. 1122, § 5, effective June 21.

L. 81:

(5)(d) amended, p. 1369, § 2, effective June 9; (6) repealed, p. 1370, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 83:

(7) amended, p. 964, § 15, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 86:

(5)(d) and (5)(g) amended, p. 985, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(5)(g) amended, p. 973, § 88, effective March 13.

L. 91:

(1), (5)(a) to (5)(d), (5)(g), and (5)(h) amended and (5)(p) added, p. 1785, § 1, effective April 11.

L. 92:

(7) amended, p. 1043, § 10, effective March 12.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1184, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(8.5) added, p. 1603, § 31, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(10) repealed, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 204, § 2, effective March 25.

L. 2021:

(8.5) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 897, § 42, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsections (2)(b), (3)(b), (4)(b), (5)(b), and (7)(b) provided for the repeal of subsections (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7), respectively, effective January 1, 2001. (See L. 97, p. 1184.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting subsection (8.5), see section 1 of chapter 341, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

26-1-120.3. Merit system transition - progress report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1189, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2000. (See L. 97, p. 1189.)

26-1-120.5. Positions exempted from merit system - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1786, § 2, effective April 11.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1190, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2001. (See L. 97, p. 1190.)

26-1-121. Appropriations - food distribution programs.

For carrying out the duties and obligations of the state department of human services and county departments pursuant to this title 26 and for matching such federal funds or meeting maintenance of effort requirements as may be available for public assistance and welfare activities in the state, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), the food pantry assistance grant program created in section 26-2-139, social services, child welfare services, rehabilitation, programs for the aging and for veterans, and related activities, the general assembly, in accordance with the constitution and laws of the state of Colorado, shall make adequate appropriations for the payment of such costs, pursuant to the budget prepared by the executive director.

Subject to the provisions of section 26-1-109 (2), if the federal law shall provide federal funds, in cash or in another form such as food stamps, for public assistance and welfare activities, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, social services, and child welfare services, not otherwise provided for in this title, the state department is authorized to make such payments or offer such services in accordance with the requirements accompanying said federal funds within the limits of available state appropriations.

When the executive director determines that adequate appropriations for the payment of the costs described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) have not been made and that an overexpenditure of an appropriation will occur based upon the state department's estimates, the state board may take actions consistent with state and federal law to bring the rate of expenditure into line with available funds. The general assembly declares that case load and utilization based on medical necessity are legitimate reasons for supplemental funding.

The general assembly shall appropriate from the general fund for the costs of administering assistance payments, food stamps, social services, the food pantry assistance grant program created in section 26-2-139, and other public assistance and welfare functions of the state department and the state's share of the costs of administering such functions by the county departments amounts sufficient for the proper and efficient performance of the duties imposed upon them by law, including a legal advisor appointed by the attorney general. The general assembly shall make two separate appropriations, one for the administrative costs of the state department and another for the administrative costs of the county departments. Any applicable matching federal funds must be apportioned in accordance with the federal regulations accompanying such funds. Any unobligated and unexpended balances of such state funds so appropriated remaining at the end of each fiscal year must be credited to the state general fund.

Beginning with fiscal year 2025-26, before making the appropriation described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the general assembly shall consider, but is not required to appropriate amounts included in, the results of the public assistance programs funding model described in section 26-1-121.5.

The expenses of training personnel for special skills relating to public assistance and welfare activities, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, the food pantry assistance grant program created in section 26-2-139, social services, child welfare services, rehabilitation, and programs for the aging, as such expenses are determined and approved by the state department, may be paid from whatever state and federal funds are available for such training purposes.

The state department is authorized to charge an administrative fee for commodities delivered to agencies that receive these commodities through food distribution programs authorized by the United States department of agriculture pursuant to 7 CFR 250.1 et seq., as amended, including the "National School Lunch Program", the "Child and Adult Care Food Program", and the "Summer Food Service Program". The department shall collect the administrative fee authorized pursuant to this subsection (4) at least once every calendar year, or when an agency's account reaches a balance of one hundred dollars or more, from agencies that receive commodities from such programs.

All administrative fees collected from agencies pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the food distribution program service fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this paragraph (b) as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the state department to defray the cost of administering the food distribution programs specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4). Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of administering the food distribution programs specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) may be invested by the state as provided in section 24-36-113, C.R.S. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund balances shall comply with any applicable federal laws or regulations. At the end of each fiscal year, any unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1173, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-20.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1083, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(c) added, p. 792, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 93:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (3) amended, p. 1145, § 84, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1221, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(4) added, p. 743, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (3) amended, p. 1991, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 20-1422), ch. 116, p. 487, § 3, effective June 22.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-235), ch. 409, p. 2894, § 2, effective June 7; (4)(a) amended, (HB 22-1334), ch. 130, p. 896, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1422, see section 1 of chapter 116, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

26-1-121.5. Public assistance funding model - workload study - evaluation - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Funding model" means the county administration of public and medical assistance programs funding model to determine the appropriate level of funding for each county required to make eligibility determinations regarding participation in a public assistance program.

"Medical assistance programs" means the following public assistance programs administered by the department of health care policy and financing: The medical assistance program, established in articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, including long-term care services; the children's basic health plan, established in article 8 of title 25.5; and the old age pension health and medical care program described in section 25.5-2-101.

"Public assistance programs" means the programs of public assistance administered by the state department pursuant to article 2 of this title 26.

On or before August 15, 2022, the state department and the department of health care policy and financing, in consultation with county departments, shall develop a scope of work for the comprehensive assessment of best practices related to the administration of public and medical assistance programs, including, but not limited to, policies, processes, size and structure of the workforce that administers the programs, information systems infrastructure, and data to ensure improved access by eligible individuals to public and medical assistance programs, timeliness of applications processing, administrative efficiency, and cost-effectiveness.

On or before November 1, 2022, the state department, after consultation with the department of health care policy and financing and county departments, shall enter into an agreement with a third party to:

Conduct the comprehensive assessment within the scope of work developed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section;

Evaluate the existing policies, processes, size and structure of program workforce, information systems infrastructure, and data for the administration of the public and medical assistance programs at the state and county levels;

Make recommendations for changes to state and county public and medical assistance program policies, processes, size and structure of program workforce, and information systems infrastructure to ensure improved access by eligible individuals to public and medical assistance programs, timeliness of applications processing, administrative efficiency, and cost-effectiveness; and

Make recommendations related to the ongoing evaluation of the public and medical assistance program system, including appropriate metrics for determining whether the efficiency and cost-effectiveness of the system has improved as a result of the implementation of recommendations made pursuant to this subsection (2)(b).

On or before July 1, 2023, the state department shall submit the results of the comprehensive assessment and recommendations required pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section to the department of health care policy and financing, the county departments, and the joint budget committee.

On or before November 1, 2023, the state department shall submit an analysis of the fiscal impact of implementing the recommendations required in subsection (2)(b) of this section to the joint budget committee. The analysis must include a determination of the feasibility of implementing the recommendations, a timeline for implementation, and cost of implementation for each fiscal year included in the timeline. The analysis must also include a discussion of any concerns expressed by the state department, the department of health care policy and financing, or the county departments related to the comprehensive assessment and recommendations described in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section.

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

On or before January 2, 2024, the state department shall enter into an agreement with an outside entity to develop a county administration of public and medical assistance programs funding model to determine the amount of money necessary to fund the administration of public and medical assistance programs in each county. The outside entity may be the same entity as the third party that performs the comprehensive assessment described in subsection (2) of this section.

The outside entity shall work with the state department, the department of health care policy and financing, and county departments to determine the appropriate process and data to be used in the development of the funding model.

On or before July 1, 2024, the outside entity shall develop the funding model for fiscal year 2025-26.

On or before November 1, 2024, the state department shall submit the results of the funding model to the joint budget committee, the department of health care policy and financing, and the county departments.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective June 30, 2026.

On or before July 1, 2025, and on or before July 1 every third year thereafter, the state department shall enter into an agreement with an outside entity to annually update and modify the funding model. The outside entity may be the same entity that developed prior versions of the funding model. The outside entity shall develop each update in consultation with the state department, the department of health care policy and financing, and the county departments.

On or before November 1, 2025, and on or before November 1 of each year thereafter, the state department shall submit the results of the funding model to the joint budget committee, the department of health care policy and financing, and the county departments.

The funding model must include:

The number of eligibility staff, lead workers, supervisors and managers, customer service staff, quality assurance staff, program integrity staff, investigators, claims establishment and collections staff, appeals staff, attorneys, and additional support staff necessary for a county to perform all responsibilities required by state and federal law, and must include a component that considers the various resources, including financial resources, required to effectively hire, train, and retain staff in their respective areas of responsibility associated with public and medical assistance programs;

Demographic data, including poverty statistics, and state and local economic drivers, including staff compensation, at both the county and regional levels, that may influence the overall cost of delivering public and medical assistance programs in each county;

The estimated administrative workload for each county to make public assistance program eligibility determinations, to be funded by the money allocated to counties pursuant to section 26-1-122;

A component that supports business process improvements as described in section 26-1-122.3 (1)(b)(IX) in each county; and

Any modifications to the public and medical assistance program system that have been implemented by the department or the department of health care policy and financing, including those that may have been recommended by the third party pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section and provided to the joint budget committee pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section.

The joint budget committee shall use the results of the funding model to inform its decisions regarding the amount of the appropriation to the state department for county administration of public assistance programs and the amount of the appropriation to the department of health care policy and financing for county administration of medical assistance programs.

The state department shall allocate money to counties for public assistance programs in accordance with the results of the funding model. The department of health care policy and financing shall allocate money to counties as permitted by state and federal law for medical assistance programs informed by the results of the funding model. If the appropriation made for a fiscal year to either department is not equal to the amount necessary to fully fund the allocations required by the funding model, the affected department shall adjust the allocation to each county to ensure that the funding made available to all counties does not exceed the annual appropriation.

On or before November 15, 2026, and on or before November 15 of each year thereafter, the state department and the department of health care policy and financing shall submit a joint report regarding the funding model to the joint budget committee. The report must include the following information concerning the previous fiscal year:

The results of the funding model, including the cost per county necessary to meet all state and federal requirements for the comprehensive delivery of public assistance benefits and medical assistance benefits;

The total amount appropriated for public assistance programs to the state department and for medical assistance programs to the department of health care policy and financing, and the difference between each county's actual allocation and the allocation amount identified by the funding model;

The final close-out for the previous fiscal year;

Any modifications made to the model to improve the accuracy of the data;

A description of any assessment performed of county business processes and workflow and a description of modifications made by a county that have improved or are intended to improve workflow and the timelines of eligibility determinations, client satisfaction, and workforce retention; and

Any other issues related to funding the delivery of public and medical assistance benefits.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement described in this subsection (7) continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-235), ch. 409, p. 2890, § 1, effective June 7.